Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB909.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 6.922 is amended to read as follows:
[Beginning in 2014 ]The Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee of the
Kentucky General Assembly shall conduct an annual evaluation of the external child
fatality and near fatality review panel established pursuant to KRS 620.055 to monitor the
operations, procedures, and recommendations of the panel and shall report its findings to
the General Assembly.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:45 AM Jacketed